Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.130

Educational material.

The secretary may provide educational materials and training to registered X-ray technicians, certified radiologic technologists, licensed practitioners and the public concerning, but not limited to, health risks associated with ionizing and nonionizing radiation, proper radiographic techniques, and X-ray and other imaging equipment maintenance. The secretary may charge fees to recover the cost of providing educational materials and training.

[ 2024 c 94 s 4; 1991 c 222 s 5.]